Massachusetts, session 194th, S2508.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the trial court shall establish a
sick leave bank for Andrew Setera, an employee of the New Bedford district court in the
department of the trial court. Any employee of the trial court may voluntarily contribute 1 or
more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Andrew Setera. If Andrew
Setera terminates employment with the trial court or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any
remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the trial court paid leave bank. Sick
leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that
necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the trial court.
of 1